src/adj-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                     North Sámi adjective lexicon                           !
! ========================================================================== !

! Some adjectival lexica, the main part of them is found in the
! file sme-lex.txt

LEXICON LEXATTR  ! This lexicon is here to give the tags to the compounding
+A:%> ATTR ; ! attributive forms.

LEXICON At !NB Have commented out everything except K ; here to avoid strange
          ! compounds like -šlailágán etc. Attr. that can be compounded with
          ! NAMAT etc are redirected to LEXATTR
+A+Attr:%> K ;
+A+Attr+Err/Sub: RHyph ;
!+A+Attr-:#%- ProperNoun ;   ! Compounds
!+A+Attr:# AGADJECT ;
!+A+Attr+lágan:lágan LAGAN ; ! Derivation !tentative !
!+A+Attr:# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
!+A+Attr:# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj !

LEXICON PrfPrc
+A+Attr:%> K ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%> K ;

LEXICON FINJU- !compounds only
+A+Attr+Use/LexSub:%> Rreal ; 
+A+AttrCmp:» NAMAT ;

LEXICON ALIT 								   !
! Both second-part compound and independent adj!
! čáhppesalit bábir							   !
! alit bábir								   !
alit+Use/Circ:alih BEAKKAN ;   ! blue				   !
ruoksat+Use/Circ:ruoks VIELG ; ! red					   !
háváš+Use/Circ:háváž BEAKKAN ; ! -times				   !
stábat+Use/Circ:stábag AGAdj ; !						   !

LEXICON NAMAT
:»»»# NAMATCont ;

LEXICON Adjective
bonju FINJU- ;
finju FINJU- ;
vinju FINJU- ;
FoU-baserejuvvon+CmpN/First:FoU-baserejuvvon PrfPrc ;
EU-dohkkehuvvon+CmpN/First:EU-dohkkehuvvon PrfPrc ;
IKT-heivehuvvon+CmpN/First:IKT-heivehuvvon PrfPrc ;
ON-jođihuvvon+CmpN/First:ON-jođihuvvon PrfPrc ;
Konsešuvdnaeaktuduvvon+CmpN/First:Konsešuvdna#eaktuduvvon PrfPrc ;
NTV-dohkkehuvvon+CmpN/First:NTV-dohkkehuvvon PrfPrc ;
accagas+Use/LexSub:accagas LEXATTR; !
allaoahppan+Use/LexSub:alla#oahppan PrfPrc ;
fágaoahppan:fága#oahppan PrfPrc ;
skuvlaoahppan:skuvla#oahppan PrfPrc ;
alpin:alpin LEXATTR ;
amerihká:amerihká At ;
bahá+Use/NG:bahá LEXATTR ;  ! This one is for "bahá vuoiŋŋat"
beaivásaš:beaivásaš At ;
ahkemearriduvvon+Use/LexSub:ahke#mearriduvvon PrfPrc ;
dálvevahágahtton+Use/LexSub:dálve#vahágahtton PrfPrc ;
bealledahkkon:bealle#dahkkon PrfPrc ;
beallegollan:bealle#gollan PrfPrc ;
beallegárvves:bealle#gárvves LEXATTR ;
bealleheat:bealleheat At ;
bearrašiivuođđuduvvon:bearrašii#vuođđuduvvon PrfPrc ;
beitosis:beitosis LEXATTR ;
bieđut:bieđđu LEXATTR ;
bihtonsámegiel:bihton#sáme#giel At ;
bivdoearreregulerejuvvon+Use/LexSub:bivdo#earre#regulerejuvvon PrfPrc ;
boagge:boagge FINJU- ;
boahkke:boahkke FINJU- ;
boahtte:boahtte At ;
boaitto:boaitto FINJU- ;
boaittobeal+Use/LexSub:boaitto#beal At ; !
boaittu:boaittu FINJU- ;
boastto FINJU- ; ! Nielsen says: "bare attr."
boasttu FINJU- ; ! Nielsen says: "bare attr."
boasttu+Use/LexSub:boastu LEXATTR; !
botká+Use/LexSub:botká LEXATTR ;
botká:botká FINJU- ;
bođu:bođu FINJU- ;
buohkanas:buohkanas At ;
buorre+Err/Sub:buore LEXATTR ;
báhcahatgiel:báhcahat#giel At ;
bálddalas:bálddalas LEXATTR ;
bárteoadjuduvvon+Use/LexSub:bárte#oadjuduvvon PrfPrc ;
ceahkkálas:ceahkkálas LEXATTR ;
ceakko:ceakko FINJU- ;
neahttavuođđuduvvon+Use/LexSub:neahtta#vuođđuduvvon PrfPrc ;
danšlái:danšlái At ;
davvisámegiel:davvi#sáme#giel At ;
diimmá:diimmá LEXATTR ;
logenar:loge#nar At ;
ruovttusráhkaduvvon:ruovttus#ráhkaduvvon PrfPrc ;
priváhttadoaibmi:priváhtta#doaibmi LEXATTR ;
dološdárogiel:dološ#dáro#giel At ;
duiskkagiel:duiskka#giel At ;
dulve:dulve FINJU- ;
dulán:dulán LEXATTR ;
duojáš:duojáš At ;
dámis:dámisis LEXATTR ;
dánskkagiel:dánskka#giel At ;
dárboiskkaduvvon:dárbo#iskkaduvvon PrfPrc ;
dárogiel:dáro#giel At ;
dássálas:dássálas LEXATTR ;
eahkes:eahkes At ;
ealas:eallasis LEXATTR ;
eamiálbmotválljejuvvon:eami#álbmot#válljejuvvon PrfPrc ;
eanas:eanas At ;
easkaoahppan:easka#oahppan PrfPrc ;
easkaráhkásmuvvan:easka#ráhkásmuvvan PrfPrc ;
easkaásahuvvon:easka#ásahuvvon PrfPrc ;
eanetlogogiel:eanet#logo#giel At ;
eatnigiel:eatni#giel At ;
eaŋgals+Err/Sub:eaŋgas LEXATTR ;
eaŋgalsgiel:eaŋgals#giel At ;
espánnjagiel:e^spánnja#giel At ;
eŋgelas+Use/LexSub:eŋgalas LEXATTR ;
eŋgelasgiel:eŋgelas#giel At ;
freestyla:free^styla At ;
fránskkagiel:fránskka#giel At ;
fuorás:fuorás LEXATTR ;
fágagiel:fága#giel At ;
gahperahtes:gahperahtes LEXATTR ;
gallás:gallás At ;
gaskandaga:gaskandaga At ;
geahpas+Use/NG:gehppes LEXATTR ; ! Alt. attr.form
gearddaš:gearddaš At ;
geažehis:geažehis LEXATTR ;
geažos:geažos At ;
gielddasámegiel:gieldda#sáme#giel At ;
girjegiel:girje#giel At ;
goassáš:goassáš At ;
goike:goike FINJU- ;
gollegiel:golle#giel At ;
gomu:gomu FINJU- ;
gorrálas:gorrálas LEXATTR ;
greikkagiel:greikka#giel At ;
guovttegearddaš:guovtte#gearddaš At ;
gurut:gurut LEXATTR ;
beallegárvvistuvvon:bealle#gárvvistuvvon PrfPrc ;
ollesšaddan:olles#šaddan PrfPrc ;
gávu:gávu FINJU- ;
harbmadas:harbmadas LEXATTR ;
heamse:heamse FINJU- ;
hebreagiel:hebrea#giel At ;
hollánddagiel:hollándda#giel At ;
hávski+Err/Sub:hávskkes At ; !
iehčanas:iehčanas LEXATTR ;
háldogáržžiduvvon:háldo#gáržžiduvvon PrfPrc ;
iešnammaduvvon:ieš#nammaduvvon PrfPrc ;
iešráhkaduvvon+Use/LexSub:ieš#ráhkaduvvon PrfPrc ; !
ihttáš:ihttáš LEXATTR ;
islánddagiel:islándda#giel At ;
ivttá:ivttá LEXATTR ;
jeahkálahtes:jeahkálahtes LEXATTR ;
jietnavuoigadahtton:jietna#vuoigadahtton PrfPrc ;
skuvlageatnegahtton:skuvla#geatnegahtton PrfPrc ;
jorggo:jorggo FINJU- ;
jorggu:jorggu FINJU- ;
julivgiel:juliv#giel At ;
jálddos:jálddos LEXATTR ;
jávohisgiel:jávohis#giel At ;
kivrosaš:kivrosaš At ;
lahka+A+Comp:lagat At ;
luonddulagaš:luonddu#lagaš LEXATTR ;
liehmos:liehmos LEXATTR ;
lietuvagiel:li^etuva#giel At ;
liige:liige FINJU- ;
luotkko:luotkko FINJU- ;
láfos:láfos LEXATTR ;
giehtasárgojuvvon:giehta#sárgojuvvon PrfPrc ;
giehtačállojuvvon:giehta#čállojuvvon PrfPrc ;
láhtengiel:láhten#giel At ;
lávžálas:lávžálas LEXATTR ;
maŋildus:maŋildus FINJU- ;
mearkagiel:mearka#giel At ;
moju:moju FINJU- ;
molssu:molssu FINJU- ;
muosvvis:muosvvis LEXATTR ;
máttasámegiel:mátta#sáme#giel At ;
nanus+Use/NG:nana LEXATTR ; ! exceptional attr form
njagu:njagu FINJU- ;
njenecgiel:njenec#giel At ;
njuogge:njuogge FINJU- ;
njázos:njázos LEXATTR ;
norgga:norgga At ;
nu% gohčoduvvon+Err/Sub:nu#gohčoduvvon PrfPrc ;
nu% gohčoduvvon:nu% gohčoduvvon PrfPrc ; !
oahpahusgiel:oahpahus#giel At ;
oallásahtes:oallásahtes LEXATTR ;
oapme:oapme FINJU- ;
oarjelsámegiel:oarjel#sáme#giel At ;
oktovuoigaduvvon:okto#vuoigaduvvon PrfPrc ;
orjjelsámegiel:orjjel#sáme#giel At ;
otná:otná LEXATTR ;
ovdaláiggiriegádan:ovdal#áiggi#riegádan PrfPrc ;
ovddaldus:ovddaldus FINJU- ;
polska:polska At ;
rahkat:rahkkes LEXATTR ;
roahkkálas:roahkkálas LEXATTR ;
rohčat:rohččes LEXATTR ;
románigiel:románi#giel At ;
ruošša:ruošša At ;
russolas:russolas LEXATTR ;
rehketdoallofievrreduvvon:rehket#doallo#fievrreduvvon PrfPrc ;
rávddis+Use/NG:rávddisis LEXATTR ; !alternating is-attr
seahkalas:seahkalas LEXATTR ;
sealbbus:sealbbosis LEXATTR ;
sealggális:sealggális At ;
selggolas:selggolas LEXATTR ;
fidnuiheivehuvvon:fidnui#heivehuvvon PrfPrc ;
sierranas:sierranas LEXATTR ;
skievttáris:skievttáris LEXATTR ;
snoakkis+Use/NG:snoagga LEXATTR ; !alternating a-attr
sohkagiel:sohka#giel At ;
sovkkenis:sovkkenis LEXATTR ;
stiivvis:stiivvisis LEXATTR ;
streaŋga:streaŋga FINJU- ;
stuor:stuor FINJU- ;
stuorra:stuorra FINJU- ;
stáhtaoamastuvvon+Use/LexSub:stáhta#oamastuvvon PrfPrc ;
doavttirdieđihuvvon+Use/LexSub:doavttir#dieđihuvvon PrfPrc ;
suohkat+Use/NG:suohkadis LEXATTR ;
sámegiel-dárogiel:sáme#giel-dáro#giel At ;
tuiskkagiel:tuiskka#giel At ;
tuljánis:tuljánis LEXATTR ;
tupaan+Use/LexSub:tupaan PrfPrc ; ! what is this? Seems Finnish
ubmisámegiel:ubmi#sáme#giel At ;
unnis:unnis LEXATTR ;
uŋgárgiel:uŋgár#giel At ;
veaittalis:veaittalis LEXATTR ;
veaitu:veaitu FINJU- ;
vealu:vealu FINJU- ;
vearro:vearro FINJU- ;
vierisgiel:vieris#giel At ;
viiddisis:viiddisis LEXATTR ;
vuosttašriegádan:vuosttaš#riegádan PrfPrc ;
vuostálas:vuostálas LEXATTR ;
vuođđogiel:vuođđo#giel At ;
vádjagiel:vádja#giel At ;
oaivilvuoigaduvvon:oaivil#vuoigaduvvon PrfPrc ;
stádaruhtaduvvon:stáda#ruhtaduvvon PrfPrc ;
vásedin:vásedin LEXATTR ;
áibmadas:áibmadas LEXATTR ;
áidna:áidna At ;
áiggáš:áiggáž LEXATTR ;
álbmotválljejuvvon+Err/Sub:álbmot#válljen PrfPrc ; !
ávda:ávda LEXATTR ;
čavde:čavde FINJU- ;
čiegus+Err/Sub:čiegos LEXATTR ;
čorgat+Err/Sub:čorgis LEXATTR ;
čuorre:čuorre FINJU- ;
čuorri:čuorri FINJU- ;
čáppat+Err/Sub:čábba LEXATTR; ! !SOUTH
almmáidominerejuvvon+Use/LexSub:almmái#dominerejuvvon PrfPrc ;
šlince:šlince FINJU- ;
šlinco:šlinco FINJU- ;
bargoheivehuvvon+Use/LexSub:bargo#heivehuvvon PrfPrc ;
šláddjás:šláddjás At ;
iešvásihuvvon:ieš#vásihuvvon PrfPrc ;
jiešbuvttaduvvon:jieš#buvttaduvvon PrfPrc ;
kulttorvuođđuduvvon+Use/LexSub:kulttor#vuođđuduvvon PrfPrc ;
jiešoahppan:jieš#oahppan PrfPrc ;
jiešvásihuvvon:jieš#vásihuvvon PrfPrc ;
jiežasválljen:jiežas#válljen PrfPrc ;
álbmotválljejuvvon:álbmot#válljejuvvon PrfPrc ;
njuolggosáddejuvvon:njuolggo#sáddejuvvon PrfPrc ;
binna% bánna:binna% bánna LEXATTR ;
láddan:láddan PrfPrc ;
geatnegahtton+Err/Sub:geatnegáhtton PrfPrc ;
lassijuolluduvvon:lassi#juolluduvvon PrfPrc ;
sisahuksejuvvon:sisa#huksejuvvon PrfPrc ;
vuoigaduvvon:vuoigaduvvon PrfPrc ;
riektačállon+CmpN/First:riekta#čállon PrfPrc ;
soahtegillán+Use/LexSub:soahte#gillán PrfPrc ;
sisaoston:sisa#oston PrfPrc ;
gumpegoddon:gumpe#goddon PrfPrc ;
boraspiregoddon:boraspire#goddon PrfPrc ;
márkanfievrriduvvon+v2:márkan#fievrreduvvon PrfPrc ;
